Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5942YH (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2034 Section 1. Section 282.18, subsection 11, paragraph a, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 A pupil who participates in open enrollment for purposes of 4 attending a grade in grades nine through twelve in a school 5 district other than the district of residence is ineligible to 6 participate in varsity interscholastic athletic contests and 7 athletic competitions during the pupilâs first ninety school 8 one hundred forty calendar days of enrollment in the district. 9 However, a pupil may participate immediately in a varsity 10 interscholastic sport under any of the following circumstances: 11